Maryland, session 2025, SB0432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information System Central
Repository in the Department.
(c) “COMPLETION OF THE SENTENCE” MEANS THE TIME WHEN A SENTENCE
HAS EXPIRED, INCLUDING ANY PERIOD OF PROBATION, PAROLE, OR MANDATORY
SUPERVISION.
(D) (1) “Court record” means an official record of a court that the clerk of a
court or other court personnel keeps about:
(i) a criminal proceeding; or
– 1 –

Ch. 95 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) any other proceeding, except a juvenile proceeding, concerning a
civil offense or infraction enacted under State or local law as a substitute for a criminal
charge.
(2) “Court record” includes:
(i) a record of a violation of the Transportation Article for which a
term of imprisonment may be imposed; and
(ii) an index, docket entry, charging document, pleading,
memorandum, transcription of proceedings, electronic recording, order, and judgment.
[(d)] (E) “Expunge” means to remove information from public inspection in
accordance with this subtitle.
[(e)] (F) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, “expungement” with
respect to a court record or a police record means removal from public inspection:
(1) by obliteration;
(2) by removal to a separate secure area to which persons who do not have
a legitimate reason for access are denied access; or
(3) if access to a court record or police record can be obtained only by
reference to another court record or police record, by the expungement of it or the part of it
that provides access.
[(f)] (G) “Law enforcement unit” means a State, county, or municipal police
department or unit, the office of a sheriff, the office of a State’s Attorney, the Office of the
State Prosecutor, or the Office of the Attorney General of the State.
[(g)] (H) “Minor traffic violation” means a nonincarcerable violation of the
Maryland Vehicle Law or any other traffic law, ordinance, or regulation.
[(h)] (I) “Police record” means an official record that a law enforcement unit,
booking facility, or the Central Repository maintains about the arrest and detention of, or
further proceeding against, a person for:
(1) a criminal charge;
(2) a suspected violation of a criminal law;
(3) a violation of the Transportation Article for which a term of
imprisonment may be imposed; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 95
(4) a civil offense or infraction, except a juvenile offense, enacted under
State or local law as a substitute for a criminal charge.
10–105.
(c) (6) A petition for expungement based on the conviction of a crime under
subsection (a)(9) of this section may not be filed within 3 years after the [conviction or
satisfactory completion of the sentence, including probation, that was imposed for the
conviction, whichever is later] COMPLETION OF THE SENTENCE.
(8) A petition for expungement based on the conviction of a crime under
subsection (a)(12) of this section may not be filed before [satisfactory] THE completion of
the sentence[, including probation, that was imposed for the conviction].
(e) (1) If the State’s Attorney files a timely objection to the petition, the court
shall hold a hearing.
(2) If the court at the hearing finds that the person is entitled to
expungement, the court shall order the expungement of all police records and court records
about the charge.
(3) If the court finds that the person is not entitled to expungement, the
court shall deny the petition.
(4) The person is not entitled to expungement if:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, the petition is
based on the entry of probation before judgment, except a probation before judgment for a
crime where the act on which the conviction is based is no longer a crime, and the person
within 3 years after the entry of the probation before judgment has been convicted of a
crime other than a minor traffic violation or a crime where the act on which the conviction
is based is no longer a crime;
(ii) the petition is based on the entry of probation before judgment
for a violation of § 21–902(a) or (b) of the Transportation Article and the person within 15
years after the entry of the probation before judgment has:
1. been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic
violation or a crime where the act on which the conviction is based is no longer a crime; or
2. received probation before judgment for a violation of §
21–902 of the Transportation Article; or
(iii) the person is a defendant in a pending criminal proceeding.
– 3 –

Ch. 95 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) IN DETERMINING WHETHER THE PERSON IS ENTITLED TO
EXPUNGEMENT, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER, TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE:
(I) THE PERSON’S SUCCESS AT PROBATION, PAROLE, OR
MANDATORY SUPERVISION; AND
(II) WHETHER THE PERSON HAS PAID ANY MONETARY
RESTITUTION ORDERED BY THE COURT IN THE ORIGINAL PROCEEDING OR DOES
NOT HAVE THE ABILITY TO PAY THE RESTITUTION.
10–110.
(a) A person may file a petition listing relevant facts for expungement of a police
record, court record, or other record maintained by the State or a political subdivision of
the State if the person is convicted of:
(1) a misdemeanor that is a violation of:
(i) § 6–320 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(ii) an offense listed in § 17–613(a) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article;
(iii) § 5–712, § 19–304, § 19–308, or Title 5, Subtitle 6 or Subtitle 9 of
the Business Regulation Article;
(iv) § 3–1508 or § 10–402 of the Courts Article;
(v) § 14–1915, § 14–2902, or § 14–2903 of the Commercial Law
Article;
(vi) § 5–211 of this article;
(vii) § 3–203 or § 3–808 of the Criminal Law Article;
(viii) § 5–601 not involving the use or possession of cannabis, §
5–602(b)(1), § 5–618, § 5–619, § 5–620, § 5–703, § 5–708, or § 5–902 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ix) § 6–105, § 6–108, § 6–205 (fourth degree burglary), § 6–206, §
6–301, § 6–303, § 6–306, § 6–307, § 6–402, or § 6–503 of the Criminal Law Article;
(x) § 7–104, § 7–203, § 7–205, § 7–304, § 7–308, or § 7–309 of the
Criminal Law Article;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 95
(xi) § 8–103, § 8–106, § 8–204, § 8–206, § 8–401, § 8–402, § 8–404, §
8–406, § 8–408, § 8–503, § 8–521, § 8–523, § 8–610, or § 8–904 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xii) § 9–204, § 9–205, § 9–408, § 9–501, § 9–502, § 9–503, or §
9–506 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xiii) § 10–110, § 10–201, § 10–402, § 10–404, or § 10–502 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xiv) § 11–303, § 11–306, or § 11–307 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xv) § 12–102, § 12–103, § 12–104, § 12–105, § 12–109, § 12–203, §
12–204, § 12–205, or § 12–302 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xvi) § 13–401, § 13–602, or § 16–201 of the Election Law Article;
(xvii) § 4–509 of the Family Law Article;
(xviii) § 18–215 of the Health – General Article;
(xix) § 4–411 or § 4–2005 of the Housing and Community Development
Article;
(xx) § 27–403, § 27–404, § 27–405, § 27–406, § 27–406.1, § 27–407, §
27–407.1, or § 27–407.2 of the Insurance Article;
(xxi) § 8–725.4, § 8–725.5, § 8–725.6, § 8–725.7, § 8–726, § 8–726.1, §
8–727.1, or § 8–738.2 of the Natural Resources Article or any prohibited act related to speed
limits for personal watercraft;
(xxii) § 10–301, § 10–306, § 10–308.1, § 10–413(e)(1), § 10–418, §
10–502, § 10–611, or § 10–907(a) of the Natural Resources Article;
(xxiii) § 5–307, § 5–308, § 6–602, § 7–402, or § 14–114 of the Public
Safety Article;
(xxiv) § 7–318.1, § 7–509, or § 10–507 of the Real Property Article;
(xxv) § 9–124 of the State Government Article;
(xxvi) § 13–1001, § 13–1004, § 13–1007, or § 13–1024 of the
Tax – General Article;
(xxvii) § 16–101 OR § 16–303 of the Transportation Article; or
– 5 –

Ch. 95 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(xxviii) the common law offenses of affray, rioting, criminal
contempt, battery, or hindering;
(2) a felony that is a violation of:
(i) § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) the prohibition against possession with intent to distribute a
controlled dangerous substance under § 5–602 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or § 6–204 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(3) an attempt, a conspiracy, or a solicitation of any offense listed in item
(1) or (2) of this subsection.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a petition for
expungement under this section may not be filed earlier than 5 years after the [person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision] COMPLETION OF THE
SENTENCE.
(2) A petition for expungement for a violation of § 3–203 of the Criminal
Law Article or common law battery may not be filed earlier than 7 years after the [person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision] COMPLETION OF THE
SENTENCE.
(3) A petition for expungement for an offense classified as a domestically
related crime under § 6–233 of this article may not be filed earlier than 15 years after the
[person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which
expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision]
COMPLETION OF THE SENTENCE.
(4) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection, a
petition for expungement of a felony may not be filed earlier than 7 years after the [person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision] COMPLETION OF THE
SENTENCE.
(5) A petition for expungement of a conviction of possession with intent to
distribute cannabis under § 5–602 of the Criminal Law Article may not be filed earlier than
3 years after the [person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for
which expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision]
COMPLETION OF THE SENTENCE.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 95
(6) A petition for expungement of a conviction for § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or a
felony that is a violation of § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article may not be filed earlier
than 10 years after the [person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all
convictions for which expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory
supervision] COMPLETION OF THE SENTENCE.
(f) (1) If the State’s Attorney or a victim files a timely objection to the petition,
the court shall hold a hearing.
(2) The court shall order the expungement of all police records and court
records about the charge after a hearing, if the court finds and states on the record:
(i) that the conviction is eligible for expungement under subsection
(a) of this section;
(ii) that the person is eligible for expungement under subsection (d)
of this section;
(iii) that giving due regard to the nature of the crime, the history and
character of the person, THE PERSON’S SUCCESS AT COURT–ORDERED PROBATION
PROBATION, PAROLE, OR MANDATORY SUPERVISION, and the person’s success at
rehabilitation, the person is not a risk to public safety; [and]
(iv) THAT THE PERSON HAS PAID ANY MONETARY RESTITUTION
ORDERED BY THE COURT IN THE ORIGINAL PROCEEDING OR DOES NOT HAVE THE
ABILITY TO PAY THE RESTITUTION; AND
(V) that an expungement would be in the interest of justice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–401.
(A) The Maryland Judiciary Case Search may not in any way refer to the existence
of records of a charge in a case with electronic records if the charge resulted in:
(1) acquittal;
(2) dismissal; [or]
(3) nolle prosequi[, except nolle prosequi with the requirement of drug or
alcohol treatment]; OR
– 7 –

Ch. 95 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) THE COURT MARKING THE CHARGE STET ON THE DOCKET AT
LEAST 3 YEARS PREVIOUSLY.
(B) THE MARYLAND JUDICIARY CASE SEARCH MAY NOT IN ANY WAY REFER
TO THE EXISTENCE OF RECORDS OF A CHARGE OF POSSESSION OF CANNABIS IN A
CASE WITH ELECTRONIC RECORDS IF THE CHARGE RESULTED IN A CONVICTION
THAT WAS LATER PARDONED BY THE GOVERNOR.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1 January 31, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 8 –